Illinois, session 104th, HB4751.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 5Section 2 and by adding Section 2.2 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 130/2)7    Sec. 2. This Act applies to the wages of laborers, 8mechanics, and other workers employed in any public works, as 9hereinafter defined, by any public body and to anyone under 10contracts for public works. This includes any maintenance, 11repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 12whether owned, leased, or rented.13    As used in this Act, unless the context indicates 14otherwise:15    "Public works" means all fixed works constructed or 16demolished by any public body, or paid for wholly or in part 17out of public funds. "Public works" as defined herein includes 18all projects financed in whole or in part with bonds, grants, 19loans, or other funds made available by or through the State or 20any of its political subdivisions, including, but not limited 21to: bonds issued under the Industrial Project Revenue Bond Act 22(Article 11, Division 74 of the Illinois Municipal Code), the 23Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act, the Illinois Finance   HB4751- 2 -LRB104 20092 SPS 33543 b1Authority Act, the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, 2or the Build Illinois Bond Act; loans or other funds made 3available pursuant to the Build Illinois Act; loans or other 4funds made available pursuant to the Riverfront Development 5Fund under Section 10-15 of the River Edge Redevelopment Zone 6Act; or funds from the Fund for Illinois' Future under Section 76z-47 of the State Finance Act, funds for school construction 8under Section 5 of the General Obligation Bond Act, funds 9authorized under Section 3 of the School Construction Bond 10Act, funds for school infrastructure under Section 6z-45 of 11the State Finance Act, and funds for transportation purposes 12under Section 4 of the General Obligation Bond Act. "Public 13works" also includes all federal construction projects 14administered or controlled by a public body if the prevailing 15rate of wages is equal to or greater than the prevailing wage 16determination by the United States Secretary of Labor for the 17same locality for the same type of construction used to 18classify the federal construction project. "Public works" also 19includes (i) all projects financed in whole or in part with 20funds from the Environmental Protection Agency under the 21Illinois Renewable Fuels Development Program Act for which 22there is no project labor agreement; (ii) all work performed 23pursuant to a public private agreement under the Public 24Private Agreements for the Illiana Expressway Act or the 25Public-Private Agreements for the South Suburban Airport Act; 26(iii) all projects undertaken under a public-private agreement   HB4751- 3 -LRB104 20092 SPS 33543 b1under the Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act 2or the Department of Natural Resources World Shooting and 3Recreational Complex Act; and (iv) all transportation 4facilities undertaken under a design-build contract or a 5Construction Manager/General Contractor contract under the 6Innovations for Transportation Infrastructure Act. "Public 7works" also includes all projects at leased facility property 8used for airport purposes under Section 35 of the Local 9Government Facility Lease Act. "Public works" also includes 10the construction of a new wind power facility by a business 11designated as a High Impact Business under Section 125.5(a)(3)(E) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, the 13construction of a new utility-scale solar power facility by a 14business designated as a High Impact Business under Section 155.5(a)(3)(E-5) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, the 16construction of a new battery energy storage solution facility 17by a business designated as a High Impact Business under 18Section 5.5(a)(3)(I) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, and 19the construction of a high voltage direct current converter 20station by a business designated as a High Impact Business 21under Section 5.5(a)(3)(J) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 22Act. "Public works" also includes electric vehicle charging 23station projects financed pursuant to the Electric Vehicle Act 24and renewable energy projects required to pay the prevailing 25wage pursuant to the Illinois Power Agency Act. "Public works" 26also includes power washing projects by a public body or paid   HB4751- 4 -LRB104 20092 SPS 33543 b1for wholly or in part out of public funds in which steam or 2pressurized water, with or without added abrasives or 3chemicals, is used to remove paint or other coatings, oils or 4grease, corrosion, or debris from a surface or to prepare a 5surface for a coating. "Public works" also includes all 6electric transmission systems projects subject to the Electric 7Transmission Systems Construction Standards Act. "Public 8works" does not include work done directly by any public 9utility company, whether or not done under public supervision 10or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of public 11funds. "Public works" also includes construction projects 12performed by a third party contracted by any public utility, 13as described in subsection (a) of Section 2.1, in public 14rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of the Public 15Utilities Act, whether or not done under public supervision or 16direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of public funds. 17"Public works" also includes construction projects that exceed 1815 aggregate miles of new fiber optic cable, performed by a 19third party contracted by any public utility, as described in 20subsection (b) of Section 2.1, in public rights-of-way, as 21defined in Section 21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, whether 22or not done under public supervision or direction, or paid for 23wholly or in part out of public funds. "Public works" also 24includes any corrective action performed pursuant to Title XVI 25of the Environmental Protection Act for which payment from the 26Underground Storage Tank Fund is requested. "Public works"   HB4751- 5 -LRB104 20092 SPS 33543 b1also includes all construction projects involving fixtures or 2permanent attachments affixed to light poles that are owned by 3a public body, including street light poles, traffic light 4poles, and other lighting fixtures, whether or not done under 5public supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part 6out of public funds, unless the project is performed by 7employees employed directly by the public body. "Public works" 8also includes work performed subject to the Mechanical 9Insulation Energy and Safety Assessment Act. "Public works" 10also includes the removal, hauling, and transportation of 11biosolids, lime sludge, and lime residue from a water 12treatment plant or facility and the disposal of biosolids, 13lime sludge, and lime residue removed from a water treatment 14plant or facility at a landfill. "Public works" also includes 15sewer inspection projects that use a closed-circuit television 16to identify issues in a sewer system, such as cracks in pipes, 17root intrusion, blockages, or other structural damage. "Public 18works" does not include projects undertaken by the owner at an 19owner-occupied single-family residence or at an owner-occupied 20unit of a multi-family residence. "Public works" does not 21include work performed for soil and water conservation 22purposes on agricultural lands, whether or not done under 23public supervision or paid for wholly or in part out of public 24funds, done directly by an owner or person who has legal 25control of those lands. 26    "Construction" means all work on public works involving   HB4751- 6 -LRB104 20092 SPS 33543 b1laborers, workers or mechanics. This includes any maintenance, 2repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 3whether owned, leased, or rented.4    "Locality" means the county where the physical work upon 5public works is performed, except (1) that if there is not 6available in the county a sufficient number of competent 7skilled laborers, workers and mechanics to construct the 8public works efficiently and properly, "locality" includes any 9other county nearest the one in which the work or construction 10is to be performed and from which such persons may be obtained 11in sufficient numbers to perform the work and (2) that, with 12respect to contracts for highway work with the Department of 13Transportation of this State, "locality" may at the discretion 14of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation be 15construed to include two or more adjacent counties from which 16workers may be accessible for work on such construction.17    "Public body" means the State or any officer, board or 18commission of the State or any political subdivision or 19department thereof, or any institution supported in whole or 20in part by public funds, and includes every county, city, 21town, village, township, school district, irrigation, utility, 22reclamation improvement or other district and every other 23political subdivision, district or municipality of the state 24whether such political subdivision, municipality or district 25operates under a special charter or not.26    "Labor organization" means an organization that is the   HB4751- 7 -LRB104 20092 SPS 33543 b1exclusive representative of an employer's employees recognized 2or certified pursuant to the National Labor Relations Act. 3    The terms "general prevailing rate of hourly wages", 4"general prevailing rate of wages" or "prevailing rate of 5wages" when used in this Act mean the hourly cash wages plus 6full journeyman annualized fringe benefits for training and 7apprenticeship programs approved by registered with the U.S. 8Department of Labor, Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training, 9Office of Apprenticeship within the U.S. Department of Labor's 10Employment and Training Administration with full journeymen 11annualized fringe benefits for health and welfare, insurance, 12vacations, and pensions paid generally, in the locality in 13which the work is being performed, to employees engaged in 14work of a similar character on public works.15(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-327, eff. 1-1-24; 16103-346, eff. 1-1-24; 103-359, eff. 7-28-23; 103-447, eff. 178-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1066, eff. 2-20-25; 104-17, 18eff. 7-1-26 (see Section 35-5 of P.A. 104-434 for effective 19date of P.A. 104-17); 104-23, eff. 6-30-25; 104-160, eff. 208-14-25; revised 12-2-25.) 21    (820 ILCS 130/2.2 new)22    Sec. 2.2. Skilled laborers. Nothing in this Act shall 23prohibit the payment of wages and fringe benefits for work 24performed under this Act that is based upon the craft and the 25skill level of the laborers, mechanics, or other employees who   HB4751- 8 -LRB104 20092 SPS 33543 b1perform the work if the wages and fringe benefits are 2established and are paid in accordance with a collective 3bargaining agreement or understanding between an employer or 4an employer association and a bona fide labor organization for 5work performed of a similar character in the locality in which 6the work is performed. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 82026.